Massachusetts, session 194th, S1317.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 203 the
following new section:-
Section 204. Every public or private employer engaged in construction, repair, or
maintenance work shall post in a conspicuous place on its premises a sign providing information
and resources on suicide prevention including, but not limited to, the 988 behavioral health
emergency line, and the words “You Are Not Alone.” The signage shall be designed and
approved by the executive office of labor and workforce development.
The sign shall be issued in English, Spanish, Chinese, Haitian Creole, Italian, Portuguese,
Vietnamese, Laotian, Khmer, Russian and any other language that is the primary language of at
least 10,000 or 1/2 of one per cent of all residents of the commonwealth. The required workplace
notice shall be in English and each language other than English which is the primary language of
of 2

5 or more employees of that workplace. The sign shall be available for download on the
department webpage and be made available in physical form.
of 2